Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 15 Court Administration

8-15-1.
Unified system.

The supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, the workers’ compensation court, and the traffic tribunal shall constitute a unified judicial system for purposes of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 13; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 8.

8-15-2.
Executive head of system.

The chief justice of the supreme court shall be the executive head of the judicial system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 1.

8-15-2.1.
Powers of the chief justice to ensure court operations.

The chief justice of the supreme court may, by order, take any action necessary to ensure the continued and efficient operation of the courts of the unified judicial system. Such necessary actions may include, but are not limited to:

Establishing alternative locations to conduct judicial business in the event that one or more court locations cannot be utilized;

Enlarging, extending, tolling, or suspending any filing, appeal, or other applicable deadline or statute of limitation in the event of the closure or curtailment of court operations or other circumstances as is necessary, in the opinion of the chief justice, to ensure the fair administration of justice;

In the event of a court closure or curtailment of court operations, suspending any judicial business that is deemed not essential by the chief justice; and

Taking any other appropriate action necessary to ensure that judicial business is effectively conducted by the courts of the unified judicial system for the duration of the order.

Any order of the chief justice closing or curtailing the operation of any court within the unified judicial system and setting forth the necessary response(s) thereto shall specify:

The nature, time period, and duration of the circumstances giving rise to the order;

The court(s) and court location(s) affected by the order;

The action(s) to be undertaken to redress the circumstances giving rise to the order; and

Any other relevant information needed to effectively respond to the circumstances giving rise to the order and ensure the continued and efficient operation of the unified judicial system for the duration of the order.

The order closing or curtailing the operation of any court within the unified judicial system shall be limited to an initial duration of not more than thirty (30) days; provided, however, that the order may be modified or extended for additional periods of thirty (30) days each at the discretion of the chief justice. Any modification or extension of the initial order shall contain the same information required for the issuance of the initial order pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

In the event that the office of the chief justice is vacant, or the chief justice is unable, by reason of illness or absence, to perform his or her duties, the associate justice of the supreme court having precedence who is present and qualified, as determined by §§

8-3-2

and

8-3-3

, shall have the power to issue an order under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 139, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

8-15-3.
Power to assign judges.

In order to aid in the prompt disposition of judicial business, the chief justice shall have power to assign a judge of any trial court to sit in any other trial courts, subject to the approval of the presiding justice or the chief judge of both the sending and the receiving courts and with the consent of the judge to be assigned; the assignment to be for a designated period which designated period shall be determined by the chief justice subject to the approval of the presiding justice or the chief judge of both the sending and receiving courts and with the consent of the judge to be assigned; provided however, that if the designated period shall expire during a trial the justice may sit until the trial is completed; and, provided further, that the justice shall have the power to sit and exercise the function of a justice of the receiving court for the purpose of rendering a decision or completing any matter pending before him or her as a justice of the receiving court at the expiration of the period. Included in these matters shall be the hearing of motions for new trials, sentencing, and any and all other functions necessary to the conclusion of cases heard before him or her as a justice of the receiving court. The provisions of this section shall be interpreted and construed liberally for the purpose of accomplishing the purpose of this section. No other judge may be assigned to another court other than as provided in this section. The chief justice may terminate the temporary assignment sooner than as agreed upon if he or she determines that the need for the assignment no longer exists.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 1; P. L. 1970, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 216, § 1.

8-15-3.1.
Chief justice — Power to assign magistrates.

The Chief justice of the supreme court has the power to assign any magistrate of the superior court, family court, district court, or traffic tribunal to any court or tribunal of the unified judicial system with the consent of the presiding justice, chief judge, and/or chief magistrate of the relevant courts. When a magistrate is so assigned, he or she shall be vested, authorized, and empowered with all the powers belonging to the magistrates of the court to which he or she is specially assigned.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 292, § 2.

8-15-4.
Appointment of court administrator and assistants.

The chief justice shall appoint a court administrator and such assistants as he or she deems necessary to aid in the administration of the judicial system. The administrator and his or her assistants shall serve at the pleasure of the chief justice.

The court administrator shall, under the direction of the chief justice, prepare an annual budget for the judicial system and submit the budget to the department of administration and perform all other necessary functions relating to the administration of the courts thereof.

It shall be the responsibility of the court administrator, under the direction of the chief justice, to act upon all administrative matters affecting the operation of the judiciary, including, but not limited to:

The preparation of the judicial payrolls;

The control of judicial appropriations for all state courts, except those as provided otherwise by law;

The procuring of office space, supplies, equipment, and professional and technical assistants for the judiciary; and

The court administrator, with the written approval of the chief justice, is authorized and empowered to adopt any rules and regulations that are deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section, a copy of which rules and regulations shall be filed with the secretary of state and available for public inspection. In the formation of these rules and regulations, the judiciary shall take into consideration and conform to, where practicable, existing policies governing financial and personnel practices within the executive branch of government.

The court administrator shall, under the direction of the chief justice, assume control of and supervise the maintenance and repair of all buildings housing the supreme and several inferior courts of justice throughout the state of Rhode Island. The general assembly shall appropriate sufficient amounts in the court budget to enable the court administrator to implement the provisions of this section.

The preparation of the annual budget for the judiciary and all state courts including salaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 1.

8-15-4.1.
Deposit of proceeds.

The state court administrator may receive the proceeds of any contract entered into by him or her for the sale, lease, or transfer of any computer hardware, software, or related services produced, maintained, or developed by the administrative office of state courts. Such proceeds shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 39.

8-15-5.
Advisory board.

The chief justice shall appoint an advisory board to consult with him or her on administrative matters. The board shall include the four (4) associate justices of the supreme court, the presiding justice of the superior court, the chief judge of the family court, the chief judge of the district court, and the chief judge of the workers’ compensation court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 13; P.L. 1995, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 8.

8-15-6.
Internal administration of courts not affected.

The presiding judge of the superior court, the chief judge of the family court, the chief judge of the district court, the chief judge of the workers’ compensation court, and the chief magistrate of the traffic tribunal shall have the power to administer the affairs of their respective courts; to establish calendars and to assign magistrates and judges to those calendars; to appoint administrative and clerical personnel for their courts; to act as authorized agent for their court; and to make rules for the conduct of their business, not inconsistent with the rules promulgated for the courts pursuant to §

8-6-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 7.

8-15-7.
Annual report of the judiciary.

Under the direction of the chief justice, the court administrator appointed pursuant to §

8-15-4

shall prepare annually a report to the legislature, which report shall contain appropriate statistics bearing on the condition of the dockets of state courts and such other information as may reflect the administration of the state court system. This information shall be furnished on forms provided by the state court administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 247, § 1.

8-15-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 293, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 476, § 2. The repeal was contingent on approval of an amendment to Article 2, § 1 of the Rhode Island Constitution, which was approved at the general election on November 7, 2006.

8-15-9.
Supervision of court imposed and court related costs, fines, restitution, and other payments, deposits, and receipts.

Within the administrative office of the state courts there shall be a finance section. The director of the finance section shall be appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court, and approved by a majority vote of the advisory board. The director of the finance section shall monitor the handling, collection, receipt, and disbursement of all court imposed or court related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges, and other monetary payments, deposits, and receipts, including, but not limited to, filing fees, court costs and fees, bail, fines, judgments, awards, restitution payments, registry of court accounts, restricted receipts accounts, child support and other support orders, and court stenographers’ accounts. The director shall be responsible for all bookkeeping and accounting of money collected or received by the clerks of the various state courts including, but not limited to, §§

8-4-8

,

8-8-16

,

8-8-17

,

8-8.2-3

and

8-10-10

. The director shall formulate and publish a policy which shall standardize the procedures for the handling, collection, receipt, and disbursement of court imposed or court related monetary payments, deposits, and receipts. The court may require all persons who enter into a payment plan for the payment of court imposed or court related fees, fines, court costs, assessments, charges and/or any other monetary obligations to provide a valid social security number, valid driver’s license number, and date of birth at the time they enter into said payment plan. Provided, however, social security numbers and driver’s license numbers shall not be part of the public record and shall be used for collection purposes only.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 25, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 160, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 4.

8-15-9.1.
Payment by credit card.

The director of the finance section of the state courts shall establish procedures, in conjunction with the state controller and general treasurer, by which court imposed fines and costs may be paid by credit card presented at the offices of the court clerks. These procedures may include the imposition of a surcharge on the credit card user for each transaction. This surcharge shall not exceed the amount charged to the state by the credit card contractor for the corresponding transaction. Nothing contained in this section shall require justices of the peace acting as bail commissioners to accept credit cards during the hours when the clerk’s offices are closed.

No person making any payment by credit card shall be relieved from liability for the underlying obligation except to the extent that the state realizes final payment of the underlying obligation in cash or the equivalent. If final payment is not made by the credit card issuer or other guarantor of payment in the credit card transaction, then the underlying obligation shall survive and the state shall retain all remedies for enforcement which would have applied if the credit card transaction had not occurred. No contract may modify the provisions of this subsection.

Credit card account numbers in the possession of a state or local government are confidential and shall not be deemed public records.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 28.

8-15-9.2.
Information to be provided to State Controller.

Each quarter the director of finance shall remit to the state controller within the department of administration data that would be necessary to enhance efforts to collect unpaid court imposed or court related fees, fines, court costs, assessments, charges and/or any other monetary obligations due and owing to the state which have been outstanding for a period of at least ninety (90) days from the date the amount was due and are not the subject of a court-ordered payment plan in good standing, or are not the subject of an appeal. This data shall include the social security numbers, valid driver’s license number, and date of birth, of the persons owing the outstanding amounts, if available. Provided, however, social security numbers and driver’s license numbers shall not be part of the public record and shall be used for collection purposes only.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 160, § 2.

8-15-9.3.
Public inspection of court payments owed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the finance section on a quarterly basis shall prepare a list of the one hundred (100) delinquent persons who owe the largest amount of court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, court costs, assessments, charges, and/or any other monetary obligations due and owing to the state that have been unpaid for a period in excess of ninety (90) days from the date that any such amounts were due and are not the subject of a court-ordered payment plan in good standing. (The above fees are hereinafter referred to as “overdue court fees.”) The list shall contain the name, city or town, and state of each person who owes overdue court fees as of the end of the quarter, together with the total amount owed, and the date of disposition. No person owing overdue court fees shall be included on such list if the underlying matter in which overdue court fees were imposed, or the amount of the fees, is the subject of an appeal.

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 35, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 36, § 1].

Any such list prepared by the director of finance shall be available to the public for inspection and shall be published on the website that is maintained by the courts; provided, however, that any such list prepared by the director shall not include any individual’s social security number or driver’s license number.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 160, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 70, § 1.

8-15-10.
Receipt and use of funds.

There is hereby established in the judicial department a restricted receipt account referred to as “Third Party Grants.” The judicial department shall have the authority to receive and expend monies from gifts, devises, grants, bequests, or donations. The judicial department is authorized to enter into any contracts necessary to obtain and expend those funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 16, § 2.

8-15-11.
Electronic filing and online payments.

In addition to any other filing fees or court costs required by law or court rule, parties to any court matter may be required to pay a technology surcharge or fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) at the inception or the conclusion of any case, or upon making any electronic payment online to any of the courts within the unified judicial system. Such surcharges or fees shall be determined by the state court administrator with the approval of the chief justice.

The collection of technology surcharges shall be monitored and supervised by the judiciary’s director of finance and shall be deposited into a restricted receipt account designated as “Rhode Island judiciary technology surcharge account,” the proceeds of which shall be solely for use by the judiciary in support of its technology infrastructure and case management system. On or before January 15, 2015, and annually thereafter on or before January 15, the judiciary’s director of finance shall file a report with the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate detailing: (1) The total amount of funds collected and deposited into the judiciary technology surcharge account for the most recently completed fiscal year; (2) The fund balance as of the date of the report; (3) An itemization of all expenditures and other uses of said funds from said account for the most recently completed fiscal year; and (4) An annual evaluation as to the appropriateness of the amount of the technology surcharge or fee.

The implementation of electronic court records shall not alter the application of §

38-2-5

to any judicial records, whether in paper or electronic format.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 1.